Utah statutes.
78A-2-112 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Grants to nonprofit legal assistance organization.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the state court administrator shall, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, solicit requests for proposals and award grants to nonprofit legal assistance providers to provide legal assistance throughout the state to:

(1)  low to moderate income victims of domestic violence; and

(2)  low to moderate income individuals in family law matters.

